California statutes. Penal Code
Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any air gauge knife is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 87.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20390.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any air gauge knife is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Belt Buckle Knife [20410. - 20490.]

20410.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any belt buckle knife is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 88.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20490.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any belt buckle knife is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Cane Sword [20510. - 20590.]

20510.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any cane sword is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 89.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20590.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any cane sword is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Lipstick Case Knife [20610. - 20690.]

20610.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any lipstick case knife is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 90.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20690.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any lipstick case knife is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Shobi-zue [20710. - 20790.]

20710.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any shobi-zue is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 91.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20790.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any shobi-zue is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Undetectable Knife [20810. - 20820.]

20810.

(a) Any person in this state who commercially manufactures or causes to be commercially manufactured, or who knowingly imports into the state for commercial sale, or who knowingly exports out of this state for commercial, dealer, wholesaler, or distributor sale, or who keeps for commercial sale, or offers or exposes for commercial, dealer, wholesaler, or distributor sale, any undetectable knife is guilty of a misdemeanor. 

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, commencing January 1, 2000, all knives or other instrument with or without a handguard that is capable of ready use as a stabbing weapon that may inflict great bodily injury or death that are commercially manufactured in this
 state that utilize materials that are not detectable by a metal detector or magnetometer, shall be manufactured to include materials that will ensure they are detectable by a metal detector or magnetometer, either handheld or otherwise, that is set at standard calibration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

20815.

Section 20810 does not apply to the manufacture or importation of any undetectable knife for sale to a law enforcement or military entity with a valid agency, department, or unit purchase order, nor does Section 20810 apply to the subsequent sale of any undetectable knife to a law enforcement or military entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

20820.

Section 20810 does not apply to the manufacture or importation of any undetectable knife for sale to a federal, state, or local historical society, museum, or institutional collection that is open to the public, provided that the undetectable knife is properly housed and secured from unauthorized handling, nor does Section 20810 apply to the subsequent sale of the knife to any of these entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Writing Pen Knife [20910. - 20990.]

20910.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any writing pen knife is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 92.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

20990.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any writing pen knife is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Ballistic Knife [21110. - 21190.]

21110.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any ballistic knife is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 93.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21190.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any ballistic knife is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Dirk or Dagger  [21310. - 21390.]

21310.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who carries concealed upon the person any dirk or dagger is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 94.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21390.

The unlawful concealed carrying upon the person of any dirk or dagger, as provided in Section 21310, is a nuisance and is subject to Sections 18000 and 18005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Switchblade Knife [21510. - 21590.]

21510.

Every person who does any of the following with a switchblade knife having a blade two or more inches in length is guilty of a misdemeanor: 

(a) Possesses the knife in the passenger’s or driver’s area of any motor vehicle in any public place or place open to the public. 

(b) Carries the knife upon the person. 

(c) Sells, offers for sale, exposes for sale, loans, transfers, or gives the knife to any other person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

21590.

The unlawful possession or carrying of any switchblade knife, as provided in Section 21510, is a nuisance and is subject to Sections 18000 and 18005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 6. KNUCKLES [21710. - 21890.]



  CHAPTER 1. Composite Knuckles or Hard Wooden Knuckles [21710. - 21710.]

21710.

Any person in this state who possesses, commercially manufactures or causes to be commercially manufactured, or who knowingly imports into the state for commercial sale, keeps for commercial sale, or offers or exposes for commercial sale, any composite knuckles or hard wooden knuckles is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Metal Knuckles [21810. - 21890.]

21810.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any metal knuckles is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 95.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21890.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, metal knuckles are a nuisance and are subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 8. SAPS AND SIMILAR WEAPONS [22210. - 22296.]

22210.

Except as provided in Section 22215 and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any leaded cane, or any instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a billy, blackjack, sandbag, sandclub, sap, or slungshot, is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 97.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

22215.

Section 22210 does not apply to the manufacture for, sale to, exposing or keeping for sale to, importation of, or lending of wooden clubs or batons to special police officers or uniformed security guards authorized to carry any wooden club or baton pursuant to Section 22295 by entities that are in the business of selling wooden clubs or batons to special police officers and uniformed security guards when engaging in transactions with those persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

22290.

Except as provided in Section 22215 and in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any leaded cane or any instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a billy, blackjack, sandbag, sandclub, sap, or slungshot is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

22295.

(a) Nothing in any provision listed in Section 16580 prohibits any police officer, special police officer, peace officer, or law enforcement officer from carrying any wooden club or baton.

(b) Nothing in any provision listed in Section 16580 prohibits a licensed private patrol operator, a qualified manager of a licensed private patrol operator, or a registered security guard, regularly employed and compensated by a person engaged in any lawful business, while actually employed and engaged in protecting and preserving property or life within the scope of employment, from carrying a baton if they comply with the requirements of Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 7580) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code relating to the carrying and use of the
 baton.

(c) Any person who has received a permit or certificate that indicates satisfactory completion of a club or baton training course approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training prior to January 1, 1983, shall not be required to obtain a baton permit pursuant to Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 7580) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) Any person employed as a county sheriff's or police security officer, as defined in Section 831.4, shall not be required to obtain a baton permit pursuant to Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 7580) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, if the person completes a course approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training in the carrying and use of the baton, within 90 days of employment.

(e) Nothing in
 any provision listed in Section 16580 prohibits an animal control officer, as described in Section 830.9, a humane officer, as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 14502 of the Corporations Code, or an illegal dumping enforcement officer, as described in Section 830.7, from carrying any wooden club or baton if the animal control officer, humane officer, or illegal dumping enforcement officer has satisfactorily completed the course of instruction certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training in the carrying and use of the club or baton. The training institution certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training to present this course, whether public or private, is authorized to charge a fee covering the cost of the training.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 58) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 287, Sec. 59.   (AB 2515)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22296.

As used in this part, a “billy,” “blackjack,” or “slungshot” does not include a nunchaku.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 434, Sec. 27.   (SB 827)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 9. SHURIKEN [22410. - 22490.]

22410.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any shuriken is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 98.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

22490.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any shuriken is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 10. STUN GUN [22610. - 22625.]

22610.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person may purchase, possess, or use a stun gun, subject to the following requirements: 

(a) No person convicted of a felony or any crime involving an assault under the laws of the United States, the State of California, or any other state, government, or country, or convicted of misuse of a stun gun under Section 244.5, shall purchase, possess, or use any stun gun. 

(b) No person addicted to any narcotic drug shall purchase, possess, or use a stun gun. 

(c) (1) No person shall sell or furnish any stun gun to a minor unless
 the minor is at least 16 years of age and has the written consent of the minor’s parent or legal guardian. 

(2) Violation of this subdivision shall be a public offense punishable by a fifty-dollar ($50) fine for the first offense. Any subsequent violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor. 

(d) No minor shall possess any stun gun unless the minor is at least 16 years of age and has the written consent of the minor’s parent or legal guardian.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

22615.

Each stun gun sold shall contain both of the following: 

(a) The name of the manufacturer stamped on the stun gun. 

(b) The serial number applied by the manufacturer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

22620.

Unless otherwise specified, any violation of this division is a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

22625.

(a) Each stun gun sold in this state shall be accompanied by an instruction booklet. 

(b) Violation of this section shall be a public offense punishable by a fifty-dollar ($50) fine for each weapon sold without the booklet.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 11. TEAR GAS AND TEAR GAS WEAPONS [22810. - 23025.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [22810. - 22840.]

22810.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person may purchase, possess, or use tear gas or any tear gas weapon for the projection or release of tear gas if the tear gas or tear gas weapon is used solely for self-defense purposes, subject to the following requirements:

(a) No person convicted of a felony or any crime involving an assault under the laws of the United States, the State of California, or any other state, government, or country, or convicted of misuse of tear gas under subdivision (g), shall purchase, possess, or use tear gas or any tear gas weapon.

(b) No person addicted to any narcotic drug shall purchase, possess, or use tear gas or any tear gas weapon.

(c) No person shall sell or furnish any tear gas or tear gas weapon to a minor.

(d) No minor shall purchase, possess, or use tear gas or any tear gas weapon.

(e) (1) No person shall purchase, possess, or use any tear gas weapon that expels a projectile, or that expels the tear gas by any method other than an aerosol spray, or that contains more than 2.5 ounces net weight of aerosol spray.

(2) Every tear gas container and tear gas weapon that may be lawfully purchased, possessed, and used pursuant to this section shall have a label that states: “WARNING: The use of this substance or device for any purpose other than self-defense is a crime under the law. The contents are dangerous — use with care.”

(3) After January 1, 1984, every tear gas container and tear gas weapon that may be lawfully purchased, possessed, and used pursuant to this section shall have a label that discloses the date on which the useful life of the tear gas weapon expires.

(4) Every tear gas container and tear gas weapon that may be lawfully purchased pursuant to this section shall be accompanied at the time of purchase by printed instructions for use.

(f) Effective March 1, 1994, every tear gas container and tear gas weapon that may be lawfully purchased, possessed, and used pursuant to this section shall be accompanied by an insert including directions for use, first aid information, safety and storage information, and explanation of the legal ramifications of improper use of the tear gas container or tear gas product.

(g) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), any person who uses tear gas or any tear gas weapon except in self-defense is guilty of a public offense and is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months, or two or three years or in a county jail not to exceed one year or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(2) If the use is against a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, engaged in the performance of official duties and the person committing the offense knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a peace officer, the offense is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months or two or three years or by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both the fine and
 imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 538.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

22815.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (d) of Section 22810, a minor who has attained the age of 16 years may purchase and possess tear gas or a tear gas weapon pursuant to this division if the minor is accompanied by a parent or guardian, or has the written consent of a parent or guardian.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 22810, a person may sell or furnish tear gas or a tear gas weapon to a minor who has attained the age of 16 years and who is accompanied by a parent or guardian, or who presents a statement of consent signed by the minor’s parent or guardian.

(c) Any civil liability of a minor arising out of the minor’s use of tear gas or a tear gas weapon other than for self-defense is
 imposed upon the parent, guardian, or other person who authorized the provision of tear gas to a minor by signing a statement of consent or accompanying the minor, as specified in subdivision (b). That parent, guardian, or other person shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor for any damages proximately resulting from the negligent or wrongful act or omission of the minor in the use of the tear gas or a tear gas weapon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 185, Sec. 5.   (AB 2176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22820.

Nothing in this division prohibits any person who is a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, from purchasing, possessing, transporting, or using any tear gas or tear gas weapon if the person has satisfactorily completed a course of instruction approved by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training in the use of tear gas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

22825.

A custodial officer of a county may carry a tear gas weapon pursuant to Section 22820 only while on duty. A custodial officer of a county may carry a tear gas weapon while off duty only in accordance with all other laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

22830.

Nothing in this division prohibits any member of the military or naval forces of this state or of the United States or any federal law enforcement officer from purchasing, possessing, or transporting any tear gas or tear gas weapon for official use in the discharge of duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

22835.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person holding a license as a private investigator pursuant to Chapter 11.3 (commencing with Section 7512) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, or as a private patrol operator pursuant to Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 7580) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, or a uniformed patrolperson employee of a private patrol operator, may purchase, possess, or transport any tear gas weapon, if it is used solely for defensive purposes in the course of the activity for which the license was issued and if the person has satisfactorily completed a course of instruction approved by the Department of Consumer Affairs in the use of tear gas.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

22840.

Nothing in this division authorizes the possession of tear gas or a tear gas weapon in any institution described in Section 4574, or within the grounds belonging or adjacent to any institution described in Section 4574, except where authorized by the person in charge of the institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Unlawful Possession, Sale, or Transportation [22900. - 22910.]

22900.

Any person, firm, or corporation who within this state knowingly sells or offers for sale, possesses, or transports any tear gas or tear gas weapon, except as permitted under the provisions of this division, is guilty of a public offense and upon conviction thereof shall be punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not exceeding one year or by a fine not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

22905.

Each tear gas weapon sold, transported, or possessed under the authority of this division shall bear the name of the manufacturer and a serial number applied by the manufacturer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

22910.

(a) Any person who changes, alters, removes, or obliterates the name of the manufacturer, the serial number, or any other mark of identification on any tear gas weapon is guilty of a public offense and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or by a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Possession of any such weapon upon which the same shall have been changed, altered, removed, or obliterated, shall be presumptive evidence that such possessor has changed, altered, removed, or obliterated the same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 539.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Permits [23000. - 23025.]

23000.

The Department of Justice may issue a permit for the possession and transportation of tear gas or a tear gas weapon that is not intended or certified for personal self-defense purposes, upon proof that good cause exists for issuance of the permit to the applicant. The permit may also allow the applicant to install, maintain, and operate a protective system involving the use of tear gas or a tear gas weapon in any place that is accurately and completely described in the permit application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

23005.

(a) An application for a permit shall satisfy all of the following requirements: 

(1) It shall be filed in writing. 

(2) It shall be signed by the applicant if an individual, or by a member or officer qualified to sign if the applicant is a firm or corporation. 

(3) It shall state the applicant’s name, business in which engaged, business address, and a full description of the place or vehicle in which the tear gas or tear gas weapon is to be transported, kept, installed, or maintained. 

(b) If the tear
 gas or tear gas weapon is to be used in connection with, or to constitute, a protective system, the application shall also contain the name of the person who is to install the protective system. 

(c) Applications and permits shall be uniform throughout the state upon forms prescribed by the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

23010.

(a) Each applicant for a permit shall pay, at the time of filing the application, a fee determined by the Department of Justice, not to exceed the application processing costs of the Department of Justice. 

(b) A permit granted pursuant to this chapter may be renewed one year from the date of issuance, and annually thereafter, upon the filing of a renewal application and the payment of a permit renewal fee, not to exceed the application processing costs of the Department of Justice. 

(c) After the department establishes fees sufficient to reimburse the department for processing costs, fees charged shall increase at a rate not to
 exceed the legislatively approved annual cost-of-living adjustments for the department’s budget.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

23015.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 23000, a bank, a savings and loan association, a credit union, or an industrial loan company that maintains more than one office or branch may make a single annual application for a permit. 

(b) In addition to the requirements set forth in this chapter, an application under this section shall separately state the business address and a full description of each office or branch in which the tear gas or tear gas weapon is to be kept, installed, or maintained. Any location addition or deletion as to an office or branch shall be reported to the department within 60 days of the change. 

(c) A single permit
 issued under this section shall allow for the possession, operation, and maintenance of tear gas at each office or branch named in the application, including any location change.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

23020.

Every person, firm, or corporation to whom a permit is issued shall either carry the permit upon the person or keep it in the place described in the permit. The permit shall be open to inspection by any peace officer or other person designated by the authority issuing the permit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

23025.

A permit issued in accordance with this chapter may be revoked or suspended by the issuing authority at any time when it appears that the need for the possession or transportation of the tear gas or tear gas weapon or protective system involving the use thereof, has ceased, or that the holder of the permit has engaged in an unlawful business or occupation or has wrongfully made use of the tear gas or tear gas weapon or the permit issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 4. FIREARMS [23500. - 34400.]



  DIVISION 1. PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS [23500. - 23520.]

23500.

The provisions listed in Section 16580 shall be known and may be cited as “The Dangerous Weapons Control Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

23505.

If any section, subdivision, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, or phrase of any provision listed in Section 16580 is for any reason held unconstitutional, that decision does not affect the validity of any other provision listed in Section 16580. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed the provisions listed in Section 16580 and each section, subdivision, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, and phrase of those provisions, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subdivisions, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, or phrases be declared unconstitutional.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 285, Sec. 25.   (AB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

23510.

(a) For purposes of Sections 25400 and 26500, Sections 27500 to 27590, inclusive, Section 28100, Sections 29610 to 29750, inclusive, Sections 29800 to 29905, inclusive, and Section 31615 of this code, and any provision listed in subdivision (a) of Section 16585 of this code, and Sections 8100, 8101, and 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, notwithstanding the fact that the term “any firearm” may be used in those sections, each firearm or the frame or receiver of each firearm constitutes a distinct and separate offense under those sections.

(b) For purposes of Section 25135, notwithstanding the fact that the term “any firearm” may be used in that section, each firearm constitutes a distinct and separate offense under
 that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 737, Sec. 6.   (AB 500)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

23515.

As used in the provisions listed in Section 16580, an offense that involves the violent use of a firearm includes any of the following: 

(a) A violation of paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 245 or a violation of subdivision (d) of Section 245. 

(b) A violation of Section 246. 

(c) A violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 417. 

(d) A violation of subdivision (c) of Section 417.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

23520.

(a) An applicant for a certificate of eligibility, as defined in Section 26710, or a dangerous weapons license or permit, as defined in subdivision (b), issued by the Department of Justice shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for purposes of conducting a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105, and for the purpose of determining if the applicant is prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(b) A dangerous weapons license or permit includes all of the following:

(1) Assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle permit, as defined in
 Article 6 (commencing with Section 31000) of Chapter 2 of Division 10.

(2) Short-barreled shotgun or rifle permit, as defined in Article 2 (commencing with Section 33300) of Chapter 8 of Division 10.

(3) Destructive device permit, as defined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 18900) of Chapter 1 of Division 5 of Title 2.

(4) Machinegun permit, as defined in Article 3 (commencing with Section 32650) of Chapter 6 of Division 10.

(5) Machinegun license, as defined in Article 4 (commencing with Section 32700) of Chapter 6 of Division 10.

(6) Tear gas permit, as defined in Chapter 3
 (commencing with Section 23000) of Division 11 of Title 3.

(c) (1) The department shall review the state and federal response pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 11105 for individuals specified in subdivision (a).

(2) The department shall retain the fingerprint impressions for subsequent arrest notification pursuant to Section 11105.2.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 26.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 2. FIREARM SAFETY DEVICES, GUN SAFES, AND RELATED WARNINGS [23620. - 23690.]

23620.

This division and Sections 16540, 16610, and 16870 shall be known and may be cited as the “Aroner-Scott-Hayden Firearms Safety Act of 1999.”
